Florida, session 2026, SB736.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 409.9064, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 409.9064âCoverage of blood pressure monitoring devices for 25 Medicaid recipients.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 27 (a)ââBlood pressure cuffâ means a blood pressure 28 measurement accessory that is used with a validated at-home 29 blood pressure monitor to measure blood pressure levels and that 30 is obtained independently of a validated at-home blood pressure 31 monitor in order to ensure proper size and fit for the patient. 32 (b)ââValidated at-home blood pressure monitorâ means a 33 blood pressure measurement device that has been validated for 34 accuracy and is listed in the United States Blood Pressure 35 Validated Device Listing developed by the American Medical 36 Association and is designed for the purpose of aiding in the 37 treatment of hypertension by measuring blood pressure levels 38 outside of the clinical setting. 39 (2)âSubject to the availability of funds and subject to any 40 limitations or directions provided in the General Appropriations 41 Act, the agency must provide coverage for validated at-home 42 blood pressure monitors and blood pressure cuffs under the 43 Medicaid pharmacy benefit for the treatment of a Medicaid 44 recipient if: 45 (a)âThe recipient has been diagnosed by his or her primary 46 care physician, or another licensed health care practitioner 47 authorized to make such diagnosis, with hypertension; and 48 (b)âA health care practitioner with the applicable 49 prescribing authority has prescribed a validated at-home blood 50 pressure monitor to assist the recipient and practitioner in 51 managing the recipientâs condition. 52 (3)âCoverage under this section includes the cost of any 53 necessary repairs or replacement parts for validated at-home 54 blood pressure monitors and blood pressure cuffs. 55 (4)âTo qualify for continued coverage under this section, 56 the Medicaid recipient must participate in follow-up care with 57 his or her treating health care practitioner, in person or 58 through telehealth, at least once every 6 months during the 59 first 18 months after the recipientâs first prescription for the 60 validated at-home blood pressure monitor has been issued under 61 this section, to assess the efficacy of using the monitor for 62 treatment or management of his or her hypertension. After the 63 first 18 months, such follow-up care must occur at least once 64 every 12 months. 65 (5)âThe agency shall seek federal approval, if needed, for 66 the implementation of this section. 67 Section 2.âThe Agency for Health Care Administration shall 68 include the rate impact of this act in the Medicaid managed 69 medical assistance program and long-term care managed care 70 program rates, as applicable, which take effect on October 1, 71 2026. 72 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.